Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-915
Drainage improvements; borrowing from county general fund permitted.

Pending the collection of assessments on any particular projects, the county treasurer may, with approval from the county board, transfer money from the general fund, which money shall be returned when collections are made of assessments of benefits as provided for by sections 31-901 to 31-933.

Laws 1959, c. 132, § 15, p. 489.